Tennessee, session 114, HB2014.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-213(b)(2), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
(H) If a person convicted of a violation of subdivision (a)(2) is, as a result of the
same course of conduct, also convicted of a violation of § 55-10-101, then the person
shall be punished for the violation of subdivision (a)(2) as a Range II offender; however,
the sentence imposed upon the person may, if appropriate, be within Range III but in no
case shall the sentence be lower than Range II.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2014
009692
- 1 -